Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4208
Control over person or property or affairs.

A guardian ad litem shall not have indirect or direct physical control over a person for whom the guardian ad litem has been appointed. A guardian ad litem shall not have indirect or direct control over the property or affairs of a person for whom the guardian ad litem has been appointed.

Laws 2016, LB934, § 21.